Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Children’s Proceedings.
Sec. 47.10.080.
Judgments and orders.

An adjudication hearing shall be completed within 120 days after a finding of probable cause is entered unless the court finds good cause to continue the hearing. When determining whether to grant a continuance for good cause, the court shall take into consideration the age of the child and the potential adverse effect that the delay may have on the child. The court, at the conclusion of the hearing, as the circumstances of the case may require, shall find and enter a judgment that the child is or is not a child in need of aid.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

If the court finds that the child is a child in need of aid, the court shall

order the child committed to the department for placement in an appropriate setting for a period of time not to exceed two years or in any event not to extend past the date the child becomes 19 years of age, except that the department, the child, or the child’s guardian ad litem may petition for and the court may grant in a hearing

one-year extensions of commitment that do not extend beyond the child’s 19th birthday if the extension is in the best interests of the child; and

additional one-year extensions of commitment past 19 years of age that do not extend beyond the person’s 21st birthday if the continued state custody is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it;

order the child released to a parent, adult family member, or guardian of the child or to another suitable person, and, in appropriate cases, order the parent, adult family member, guardian, or other person to provide medical or other care and treatment; if the court releases the child, it shall direct the department to supervise the care and treatment given to the child, but the court may dispense with the department’s supervision if the court finds that the adult to whom the child is released will adequately care for the child without supervision; the department’s supervision may not exceed two years or in any event extend past the date the child reaches 19 years of age, except that the department or the child’s guardian ad litem may petition for and the court may grant in a hearing

one-year extensions of supervision that do not extend beyond the child’s 19th birthday if the extensions are in the best interests of the child; and

an additional one-year period of supervision past 19 years of age if the continued supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it; or

order, under the grounds specified in (o) of this section or AS

47.10.088

, the termination of parental rights and responsibilities of one or both parents and commit the child to the custody of the department; the department shall report quarterly to the court and shall demonstrate in its report that the department is making reasonable efforts to find a permanent placement for the child.

An order issued under (c)(3) of this section authorizes the commissioner of health and social services or a designee or the guardian of the person of the child to consent to the adoption of the child.

If the court finds that the minor is not a child in need of aid, it shall immediately order the minor released from the department’s custody and returned to the minor’s parents, guardian, or custodian, and dismiss the case.

A child found to be a child in need of aid is a ward of the state while committed to the department or the department has the power to supervise the child’s actions. For an order made under (c)(1) of this section, the court shall hold a permanency hearing as required by (l) of this section and at least annually thereafter during the continuation of foster care to determine if continued placement, as it is being provided, is in the best interest of the child. The department, the child, and the child’s parents, guardian, and guardian ad litem are entitled, when good cause is shown, to a permanency hearing on application. If the application is granted, the court shall afford these persons and their counsel reasonable advance notice and hold a permanency hearing where these persons and their counsel shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard. The persons entitled to notice under AS

47.10.030(b)

and the grandparents entitled to notice under AS

47.10.030(d)

are entitled to notice of a permanency hearing under this subsection and are also entitled to be heard at the hearing. The child shall be afforded the opportunity to be present and to be heard at the permanency hearing. After the permanency hearing, the court shall make the written findings that are required under (l) of this section. The court shall review an order made under (c)(2) of this section at least annually to determine if continued supervision, as it is being provided, is in the best interest of the child; this review is not considered to be a permanency hearing and is not governed by the provisions of this subsection that relate to permanency hearings.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

A child or the child’s parents, guardian, or guardian ad litem, or attorney, acting on the child’s behalf, or the department may appeal a judgment or order, or the stay, modification, setting aside, revocation, or enlargement of a judgment or order issued by the court under this chapter. Absent extraordinary circumstances, a decision on the appeal shall be issued no later than 90 days after the latest of the following:

the date oral argument, if any, is heard on the appeal; or

45 days after the last date oral argument could have been timely requested if oral argument was not requested.

[Repealed, § 29 ch 63 SLA 1977.]

[Repealed, § 69 ch 99 SLA 1998.]

Within 12 months after the date a child enters foster care as calculated under AS

47.10.088(f)

, the court shall hold a permanency hearing. The hearing and permanent plan developed in the hearing are governed by the following provisions:

the persons entitled to be heard under AS

47.10.070

or under (f) of this section are also entitled to be heard at the hearing held under this subsection;

when establishing the permanent plan for the child, the court shall make appropriate written findings, including findings related to whether

and when the child should be returned to the parent or guardian;

the child should be placed for adoption or legal guardianship and whether a petition for termination of parental rights should be filed by the department; and

there is a compelling reason that the most appropriate placement for the child is in another planned, permanent living arrangement and the department has recommended the arrangement under AS

47.14.100(o)

; the findings under this paragraph must include the steps that are necessary to achieve the new arrangement;

if the court is unable to make a finding required under (2) of this subsection, the court shall hold another hearing within a reasonable period of time;

in addition to the findings required by (2) of this subsection, the court shall also make appropriate written findings related to

whether the department has made the reasonable efforts required under AS

47.10.086

to offer appropriate family support services to remedy the parent’s or guardian’s conduct or conditions in the home that made the child a child in need of aid under this chapter;

whether the parent or guardian has made substantial progress to remedy the parent’s or guardian’s conduct or conditions in the home that made the child a child in need of aid under this chapter;

if the permanent plan is for the child to remain in out-of- home care, whether

the child’s out-of-home placement continues to be appropriate and in the best interests of the child; and

the department is making reasonable efforts to find a permanent placement for the child; and

whether the department has made reasonable efforts to finalize the permanent plan for the child;

the court shall hold a hearing to review the permanent plan at least annually until successful implementation of the plan; if the plan approved by the court changes after the hearing, the department shall promptly apply to the court for another permanency hearing, and the court shall conduct the hearing within 30 days after application by the department;

if the court finds, under (4)(C)(ii) of this subsection, that the department is not making reasonable efforts to find a permanent placement for the child, the court shall order the department to make reasonable efforts to find a permanent placement for the child unless the current placement is in the best interests of the child.

in a hearing to review the permanent plan under AS

47.10.111(c)

or

47.10.112(c)

, the court shall make written findings related to whether

the person who filed the petition or proxy is entitled to placement preference under AS

47.14.100(e)

or 25 U.S.C. 1915(a), whichever is applicable; and

if 25 U.S.C. 1915(a) applies, the current placement is in compliance with or whether there is good cause to deviate from the placement preferences.

[Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

[Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

For purposes of terminating a parent’s parental rights under the standards in (c)(3) of this section, the court may determine that incarceration of the parent is sufficient grounds for determining that a child is a child in need of aid under AS

47.10.011

as a result of parental conduct and that the parental rights of the incarcerated parent should be terminated if the court finds, based on clear and convincing evidence, that

the period of incarceration that the parent is scheduled to serve during the child’s minority is significant considering the child’s age and the child’s need for an adult’s care and supervision;

there is not another parent willing and able to care for the child; and

the incarcerated parent has failed to make adequate provisions for care of the child during the period of incarceration that will be during the child’s minority.

If a child is removed from the parental home, the department shall provide reasonable visitation between the child and the child’s parents, guardian, and family. When determining what constitutes reasonable visitation with a family member, the department shall consider the nature and quality of the relationship that existed between the child and the family member before the child was committed to the custody of the department. The court may require the department to file a visitation plan with the court. The department may deny visitation to the parents, guardian, or family members if there is clear and convincing evidence that visits are not in the child’s best interests. If the department denies visitation to a parent or family member of a child, the department shall inform the parent or family member of a reason for the denial and of the parent’s or adult family member’s right to request a review hearing as an interested person. A parent, adult family member, or guardian who is denied visitation may request a review hearing. A non-party adult family member requesting a review hearing under this subsection is not eligible for publicly appointed legal counsel.

If the court orders a child committed to the department under (c) of this section and the department places the child in licensed foster care, the department shall

provide the foster parent with a copy of

appropriate information held by the department regarding the child to the extent required by AS

47.12.310(b)(2)(H)

;

all initial, updated, and revised case service plans for the child, court orders relating to the child, and the child’s medical, mental, and education reports prepared by or for the department, including reports compiled before the child was placed with the foster parent; and

supplements to the plans, orders, and reports described in (B) of this paragraph;

require the foster parent to

maintain and update records regarding medical, mental, educational, and behavioral services provided to the child;

provide all records described in (A) of this paragraph to the department when the child leaves the foster home placement; and

maintain the confidentiality of records regarding a child placed in the foster home except when disclosure of the records is allowed under regulations of the department or when disclosure is reasonably necessary to ensure continuation of care for the child through appropriate medical, mental, educational, and behavioral services.

If the court orders a child committed to the department under (c) of this section, the court shall order the child’s parent or guardian to provide the department with

the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of all of the child’s medical providers;

the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of mental health providers that have provided services to the child;

the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of schools, preschools, or day care facilities that the child was attending before the child was committed to the department;

a description of special needs of the child, if any; and

the names and locations of relatives who may be willing to have the child placed in their home.

The department may transfer a child, in the child’s best interests, from one placement setting to another, and the child, the child’s parents or guardian, the child’s foster parents or out-of-home caregiver, the child’s guardian ad litem, the child’s attorney, and the child’s tribe are entitled to advance notice of a nonemergency transfer. A party opposed to the proposed transfer may request a hearing and must prove by clear and convincing evidence that the transfer would be contrary to the best interests of the child for the court to deny the transfer. A foster parent or out-of-home caregiver who requests a nonemergency change in placement of the child shall provide the department with reasonable advance notice of the requested change. When the department transfers a child from one out-of-home placement to another, the department shall search for an appropriate placement with an adult family member or a family friend who meets the foster care licensing requirements established by the department. A supervisor at the department shall certify in writing in the case file whether the department has searched for an appropriate placement with an adult family member or family friend. If the department has not complied with the search requirements under this subsection, the supervisor shall work to ensure that the department completes the search in the shortest time feasible.

For a child who is placed in foster care, when the department finds that it is in the best interest of a child and that the foster family will not be placed in undue risk of harm, the department shall require foster parents to provide regular opportunities for visitation with the child by the parents of the child and encourage foster parents to serve as mentors for facilitating family reunification.

A hearing conducted under this section is open to the public unless an exception provided in AS

47.10.070(c)

applies to make the hearing closed to the public or unless prohibited by federal or state statute or regulation.

In addition to the extensions of state custody ordered by a court under (c)(1)(A) or (B) of this section, a court may grant in a hearing a resumption of state custody that does not extend beyond a person’s 21st birthday if the person

consents to it;

was placed in out-of-home care by the department immediately before being released from state custody and the person was

at least 18 years of age and released to the person’s own custody; or

at least 16 years of age and released to the

person’s own custody after the disabilities of minority were removed under AS

09.55.590

; or

custody of a parent or guardian because the person refused out-of-home care;

is in need of out-of-home care

to avoid personal harm;

because of the person’s severe emotional disturbance, mental disability, physical disability, homelessness, or a combination of those conditions;

because the person is completing an educational or vocational program; or

to otherwise improve the person’s successful transition to independent living; and

if requested by the department, agrees to reasonable terms for resuming state custody that may include matters relating to the person’s education, attainment of a job or life skills, or other terms found by the court to be reasonable and in the person’s best interest.

The court shall recognize a presumption that maintenance of a sibling relationship, including with a sibling who is related by blood, marriage, or adoption through one parent, is in a child’s best interest.

In any team-decision meeting the department holds to address the potential or actual transfer of a child from one placement setting to another, the department shall ask the participants for input regarding whether it is in the child’s best interest for the child to remain in the child’s current school for the remainder of the school term.

If the department transfers a child from one placement setting to another and it is reasonable and in the child’s best educational interests, the department shall immediately, and in advance of the transfer if possible, coordinate with the school the child is attending to ensure the child is permitted to attend that school through the end of the school term if the child’s new placement is in the same municipality and connected by road to the school. If federal funds and school district transportation funds are not available to pay for the cost of transportation for the child, the department shall pay the costs of transporting the child to school. The department shall work with the family or agency where the child is placed to arrange for transportation. The department shall consult with the school district regarding the child’s best interests, but the school district may not override the department’s decision to allow a child to remain in the current school through the end of the school term.

History.

(§ 10(2) art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 110 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 118 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 1967; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 27 SLA 1970; am §§ 12 — 15 ch 245 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am §§ 6, 7 ch 1 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 125 SLA 1974; am §§ 14 — 18, 29 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 6 ch 86 SLA 1979; am §§ 4, 5 ch 117 SLA 1990; am § 8 ch 63 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1993; am § 11 ch 113 SLA 1994; am § 30 ch 23 SLA 1995; am §§ 20 — 26, 55 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 89 SLA 1996; am §§ 2, 3 ch 94 SLA 1997; am §§ 24 — 30, 69 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 20 ch 33 SLA 1999; am § 4 ch 43 SLA 2001; am § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003; am §§ 11 — 14 ch 64 SLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 80 SLA 2010; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 59 SLA 2012; am § 8 ch 6 4SSLA 2016; am § 3 — 6 ch 7 4SSLA 2016; am § 8 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Effective August 11, 1996, former subsection (b) was amended by § 3, ch. 144, SLA 1996.
See AS

47.12.120

for provisions that replaced former subsection (b) when that subsection was repealed by § 55, ch. 59, SLA 1996, effective September 10, 1996. Also, section 4, ch. 144, SLA 1996, effective August 11, 1996, added a section governing enforcement of restitution orders under former (b)(4) of this section. Under § 7, ch. 144, SLA 1996, that section was renumbered as AS

47.12.170

, effective September 10, 1996. In 1998, in subparagraph (q)(1)(A), “AS

47.12.310(b)(2)(H)

” was substituted for “AS 47.12.310(b)(8)” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of AS 47.12.310(b)(8).

In 2016, in subparagraph AS

47.10.080

(

l

)(2)(C), a reference to “AS

47.14.100

(o)” was substituted for “AS

47.14.100

(p)” to reconcile the changes made to AS 47.14.100 in 2012.

Cross references. —

For purpose of enactment of subsection (o) as a response to judicial decisions, see § 1,
ch. 89, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For purpose and intent of 1998 amendments to this section, including the purpose of overriding certain court decisions, see § 1,
ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts. For effect of the 1998 amendments to this section on Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see §§ 71-75, ch. 99, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts. For the effect of the 2001 amendments on Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules 3, 7, 10, 15, 17, and 19, see § 6,
ch. 43, SLA 2001 in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the text of Rule 17.2(f), Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, adding to the required findings a determination as to whether the department has made reasonable efforts to finalize the child’s permanent placement, as required by the 2005 amendment of (

l

) of this section, see § 53,
ch. 64, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

For the effect of the 2016 amendments to subsection (

l

) on Rule 17.2, Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, see sec. 15, ch. 7, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendment to subsection (s), see sec. 22(a), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For residential psychiatric treatment centers, see 7 AAC 50, art. 9.

For children in custody or under supervision: needs and income, see 7 AAC 53, art. 3.

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective June 3, 2003, repealed subsections (m) and (n).

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (c) inserted “not to extend” in the introductory language of paragraph (1) and substituted “adult family member” for “relative” in paragraph (2); added subparagraph (

l

)(4)(D) and made related stylistic changes; in subsection (p) added the fifth sentence, inserted “, adult family member,” in the next-to-last sentence, and added the last sentence; and added subsections (t) and (u).

The 2010 amendment, effective January 1, 2011, in (c)(1), added “, the child,” following “except that the department”; in (c)(1)(B), substituted “additional one-year extensions of commitment” for “an additional one-year period of state custody”, added “that do not extend beyond the person’s 21st birthday” following “past 19 years of age”; added (v).

The 2012 amendment, effective September 9, 2012, in (

l

)(2)(C), added “there is a compelling reason that the most appropriate placement for” preceding “the child”, and substituted “is in another planned” for “should be placed in another planned”, and “and the department has recommended the arrangement under AS

47.14.100(p)

; the findings under this paragraph must include the steps that” for “and what steps”; in (v)(2), added the (v)(2)(A) and (v)(2)(B) designations, in (v)(2)(A), added “at least 18 years of age”, added (v)(2)(B); in (v)(3), added the (v)(3)(A) — (D) designations, added (v)(3)(B) and (v)(3)(C), in (v)(3)(D), deleted “enhance the person’s ability to continue the person’s education or training or” preceding “otherwise improve the person’s successful”; added (w).

The first 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (

l

)(6) [now (

l

)(7)], and made a related change.

The second 2016 amendment, effective October 24, 2016, in (c)(3), substituted “; the department shall report quarterly to the court and shall demonstrate in its report that the department is making reasonable efforts” for “, and the department shall report quarterly to the court on efforts being made”; added (

l

)(4)(C)(ii), and made a stylistic and a related change, added (

l

)(6); added the last sentence in (s); added (x) and (y).

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, in (s), added the last two sentences.

Editor’s notes. —

Chapter 89, SLA 1996, which added subsection (o), provides at § 1 that “the purpose of this Act is to respond to the Alaska Supreme Court’s invitation in A.M. v. State of Alaska, 891 P.2d 815 (Alaska 1995) and Nada A. V. State of Alaska, 660 P.2d 436 (Alaska 1983) to create a statutory basis for making incarceration a factor that can be considered in termination proceedings concerning children in need of aid.”

Section 79(b),
ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to this section apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under
AS 47.10,
AS 47.12,
AS 47.17, or
AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

Section 60(d),
ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendment of (

l

) of this section has the effect of amending Rule 17.2(f), Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, by modifying the grounds for review of a permanent plan.

Section 61(a), ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 addition of (u) of this section “has the effect of changing Rule 3, Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules, by allowing members of the public to attend court hearings except in certain circumstances.”

Under § 62(b), ch. 64, SLA 2005, the 2005 amendment of subsection (c) and addition of subsections (t) and (u) apply “to all proceedings and hearings conducted on or after July 1, 2005.”

Under § 62(c), ch. 64, SLA 2005, subsections (t) and (u) of this section “apply to all information, records, and files created on or after July 1, 2005; however, if a file contains information and records that were created before July 1, 2005, that information and those records retain the confidentiality that they had under the law on June 30, 2005.”

Under sec. 18,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, paragraph (l)(7) applies "to proceedings for adoption or legal guardianship of a child in state custody under
AS 47.10 filed on or after January 1, 2017."

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the 1998 amendments to this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal 2201.

Sec. 47.10.081.
Predisposition hearing reports.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

Before the disposition hearing of a child in need of aid, the department shall submit a predisposition report to aid the court in its selection of a disposition. This report must include, but is not limited to, the following:

a statement of changes in the child’s or parent’s behavior, which will aid the court in determining that supervision of the family or placement is no longer necessary;

if removal from the home is recommended, a description of the reasons the child cannot be protected or rehabilitated adequately in the home, including a description of any previous efforts to work with the parents and the child in the home and the parents’ attitude toward placement of the child;

a description of the potential harm to the child that may result from removal from the home and any efforts that can be made to minimize such harm; and

any further information that the court may request.

The court shall inform the child, the child’s parents and the attorneys representing the parties and the guardian ad litem that the predisposition report will be available to them not less than 10 days before the disposition hearing.

For purposes of this section, “parents” means the natural or adoptive parents, and any legal guardian, relative, or other adult person with whom the child has resided and who has acted as a parent in providing for the child for a continuous period of time before this action.

History.

(§ 26 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 17 ch 57 SLA 1991; am § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.10.082.
Health and safety of child and other considerations.

In making its dispositional order under AS

47.10.080(c)

, the court shall keep the health and safety of the child as the court’s paramount concern and consider

the best interests of the child;

the ability of the state to take custody and to care for the child to protect the child’s best interests under AS

47.10.005

—

47.10.142

; and

the potential harm to the child caused by removal of the child from the home and family environment.

History.

(§ 26 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 27 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 31 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to this section apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.10.083.
Review of orders, requests for extensions.

In a review under AS

47.10.080(f)

and in a hearing related to a request for extended commitment or extended supervision under AS

47.10.080(c)(1)

or (2), the court shall, in addition to the requirements of those provisions and the requirements of court rules, determine whether a child continues to be a child in need of aid at the time of the review or hearing. The court may not continue or extend state custody or supervision of the child unless the court finds that the child continues to be a child in need of aid except that, if the child is no longer a child in need of aid, the court may establish a specific timetable for gradual reunification of the family and termination of state custody or supervision if the court makes a finding that immediate reunification would be detrimental to the child.

History.

(§ 26 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 29 SLA 1990)

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent in connection with the enactment of this section by § 3,
ch. 29, SLA 1990 (SCS CSHB 175(Jud)), see 1990 Senate Journal 3431.

Sec. 47.10.084.
Legal custody, guardianship, and residual parental rights and responsibilities.

When a child is committed under AS

47.10.080(c)(1)

to the department, released under AS

47.10.080(c)(2)

to the child’s parents, guardian, or other suitable person, or committed to the department or to a legally appointed guardian of the person of the child under AS

47.10.080(c)(3)

, a relationship of legal custody exists. This relationship imposes on the department and its authorized agents or the parents, guardian, or other suitable person the responsibility of physical care and control of the child, the determination of where and with whom the child shall live, the right and duty to protect, nurture, train, and discipline the child, the duty of providing the child with food, shelter, education, and medical care, and the right and responsibility to make decisions of financial significance concerning the child. These obligations are subject to any residual parental rights and responsibilities and rights and responsibilities of a guardian if one has been appointed. When a child is committed to the department and the department places the child with the child’s parent, the parent has the responsibility to provide and pay for food, shelter, education, and medical care for the child. When parental rights have been terminated, or there are no living parents and no guardian has been appointed, the responsibilities of legal custody include those in (b) and (c) of this section. The department or person having legal custody of the child may delegate any of the responsibilities under this section, except authority to consent to marriage, adoption, and military enlistment may not be delegated. For purposes of this chapter, a person in charge of a placement setting is an agent of the department.

When a guardian is appointed for the child, the court shall specify in its order the rights and responsibilities of the guardian. The guardian may be removed only by court order. The rights and responsibilities may include, but are not limited to, having the right and responsibility of reasonable visitation, consenting to marriage, consenting to military enlistment, consenting to major medical treatment, obtaining representation for the child in legal actions, and making decisions of legal or financial significance concerning the child.

When there has been transfer of legal custody or appointment of a guardian and parental rights have not been terminated by court decree, the parents shall have residual rights and responsibilities. These residual rights and responsibilities of the parent include, but are not limited to, the right and responsibility of reasonable visitation, consent to adoption, consent to marriage, consent to military enlistment, consent to major medical treatment except in cases of emergency or cases falling under AS

25.20.025

, and the responsibility for support, except if by court order any residual right and responsibility has been delegated to a guardian under (b) of this section. In this subsection, “major medical treatment” includes the administration of medication used to treat a mental health disorder.

When the child is placed in foster care, the foster parent has the right and responsibility to use a reasonable and prudent parent standard to make decisions relating to the child. The foster parent may make decisions under (a) or (b) of this section that include decisions relating to the child’s participation in age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities, including travel, sports, field trips, overnight activities, and extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities. The department shall provide foster parents with training regarding the reasonable and prudent parent standard. In this subsection, “reasonable and prudent parent standard” means a standard characterized by careful and sensible decisions to maintain the health, safety, and best interests of the child while encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child.

History.

(§ 26 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1993; am § 28 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 32 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 64 SLA 2005; am § 9 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendment to subsection (d), see sec. 22(a),
ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence in subsection (c).

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, added (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to this section apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79, ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of AS 47.10 or AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.

Sec. 47.10.085.
Medical treatment by religious means.

In a case in which the minor’s status as a child in need of aid is sought to be based on the need for medical care, the court may, upon consideration of the health of the minor and the fact, if it is a fact, that the minor is being provided treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by an accredited practitioner of the church or denomination, dismiss the proceedings and thereby close the matter.
This may be done, in the interests of justice and religious freedom, on the court’s own motion or upon the application of a party to the proceedings, at any stage of the proceedings after information is given to the court under AS

47.10.020(a)

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 1 SLA 1972; am § 19 ch 63 SLA 1977)

Cross references. —

For a related provision, see AS

47.17.020(d)

.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 56, art. 2.